Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.04.475

Order to refrain from violations or practices—Jurisdiction of courts in enforcement or issuance of orders, injunctions, or judicial review.

(1) The director may apply to the superior court of the county of the principal place of business of the bank affected for the enforcement of any effective and outstanding order issued under RCW 30A.04.450, 30A.04.455, 30A.04.465, or 30A.12.042, and the court shall have jurisdiction to order compliance therewith.

(2) No court shall have jurisdiction to affect by injunction or otherwise the issuance or enforcement of any order or to review, modify, suspend, terminate, or set aside any order except as provided in RCW 30A.04.460, 30A.04.465, and 30A.04.470.

[ 2014 c 37 s 141; 2010 c 88 s 19; 1994 c 92 s 35; 1977 ex.s. c 178 s 9. Formerly RCW 30.04.475.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 88: See RCW 32.50.900.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 178: See note following RCW 30A.04.450.